North Dakota, session 69, HB1062.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 49-04-07 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
49-04-07. Unreasonable preferences or advantages prohibited.
No public utility shall make or give any undue or unreasonable preference or advantage to any
particular person, company, firm, corporation, limited liability company, or locality, or to any particular
character of traffic or service in any respect whatsoever, nor subject any particular person, firm,
corporation, limited liability company, company, or locality, or any particular character of traffic or service
to any undue or unreasonable prejudice or disadvantage in any respect. No public utility corporation,
directly or indirectly, by any special rate, rebate, drawback, or other device or method, shall charge,
demand, collect, or receive from any person, firm, corporation, or limited liability company a greater or
less compensation for any service rendered or to be rendered than it charges, demands, collects, or
receives from any other person, firm, corporation, or limited liability company for doing a like and
contemporaneous service under the same or substantially similar circumstances and conditions.
Nothing in this chapter shall prohibit a public utility from entering into any reasonable agreement with its
customers, consumers, or employees or from providing for a sliding scale of charges, unless the same
is prohibited by the terms of the franchise or permit under which such public utility is operated. No such
agreement or sliding scale shall be lawful unless and until the same shall be filed with and approved by
the commission.
SECTION 2. REPEAL. Sections 49-04-08, 49-04-09, and 49-04-10 of the North Dakota Century
Code are repealed.

H. B. NO. 1062 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
Speaker of the House President of the Senate
____________________________ ____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House Secretary of the Senate
This certifies that the within bill originated in the House of Representatives of the Sixty-ninth Legislative
Assembly of North Dakota and is known on the records of that body as House Bill No. 1062.
House Vote: Yeas 90 Nays 0 Absent 4
Senate Vote: Yeas 46 Nays 1 Absent 0
____________________________
Chief Clerk of the House
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State